Missouri, session 2026, SB1239.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 144.014, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 144.014,
to read as follows:
144.014. 1. (1) Notwithstanding other provisions of
law to the contrary, [beginning October 1, 1997, the tax
levied and imposed under this chapter on] all retail sales
of food shall be [at the rate of one percent. The revenue
derived from the one percent rate pursuant to this section
shall be deposited by the state treasurer in the school
district trust fund and shall be distributed as provided in
section 144.701] exempted from the provisions of and from
the computation of the tax levied, assessed, or payable
pursuant to this chapter.
(2) Beginning January 1, 2027, the rate of sales tax
imposed on all retail sales of food pursuant to the local
sales tax law as defined in section 32.085, and section
238.235, shall annually be reduced in four equal increments
over a period of four years. Beginning January 1, 2031,
notwithstanding other provisions of law to the contrary, all
retail sales of food shall be exempted from the provisions
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1239 2
of and from the computation of the tax levied, assessed, or
payable pursuant to the local sales tax law as defined in
section 32.085 and section 238.235.
2. For the purposes of this section, the term "food"
shall include only those products and types of food for
which food stamps may be redeemed pursuant to the provisions
of the Federal Food Stamp Program as contained in 7 U.S.C.
Section 2012, as that section now reads or as it may be
amended hereafter, and shall include food dispensed by or
through vending machines. For the purpose of this section,
except for vending machine sales, the term "food" shall not
include food or drink sold by any establishment where the
gross receipts derived from the sale of food prepared by
such establishment for immediate consumption on or off the
premises of the establishment constitutes more than eighty
percent of the total gross receipts of that establishment,
regardless of whether such prepared food is consumed on the
premises of that establishment, including, but not limited
to, sales of food by any restaurant, fast food restaurant,
delicatessen, eating house, or café.
✓